California statutes. Education Code
(a) The governing board of each school district and each county superintendent of schools shall appoint a supervisor of attendance and any assistant supervisors of attendance as may be necessary to supervise the attendance of pupils in the school district or county. The governing board of the school district or county superintendent of schools shall prescribe the duties of the supervisor of attendance and assistant supervisors of attendance to include, among other duties that may be required, those specific duties related to compulsory full-time education, truancy, work permits, compulsory continuation education, and opportunity schools, classes, and programs, now required of the attendance supervisors by this chapter and Article 4 (commencing
 with Section 48450) of Chapter 3 and Article 2 (commencing with Section 48640) of Chapter 4.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that in performing his or her duties, the supervisor of attendance promote a culture of attendance and establish a system to accurately track pupil attendance in order to achieve all of the following:

(1) Raise the awareness of school personnel, parents, guardians, caregivers, community partners, and local businesses of the effects of chronic absenteeism and truancy and other challenges associated with poor attendance.

(2) Identify and respond to grade level or pupil subgroup patterns of chronic absenteeism or truancy.

(3) Identify and address factors contributing to chronic absenteeism and habitual truancy, including suspension and expulsion.

(4) Ensure that pupils with attendance problems are identified as early as possible to provide applicable support services and interventions.

(5) Evaluate the effectiveness of strategies implemented to reduce chronic absenteeism rates and truancy rates.

(c) When a pupil with a temporary disability, as defined in Section 48206.3, is receiving individual instruction in the home or a hospital or other residential health facility, the supervisor of attendance shall ensure that absences from the pupil’s regular school program are excused until the pupil is able to return to the regular
 school program.

(d) The supervisor of attendance may provide support services and interventions, which may include, but are not limited to, any or all of the following:

(1) A conference between school personnel, the pupil’s parent or guardian, and the pupil.

(2) Promoting cocurricular and extracurricular activities that increase pupil connectedness to school, such as tutoring, mentoring, the arts, service learning, or athletics.

(3) Recognizing pupils who achieve excellent attendance or demonstrate significant improvement in attendance.

(4) Referral to a school nurse, school counselor, school psychologist,
 school social worker, and other pupil support personnel for case management and counseling.

(5) Collaboration with child welfare services, law enforcement, courts, public health care agencies, or government agencies, or medical, mental health, and oral health care providers to receive necessary services.

(6) Collaborating with school study teams, guidance teams, school attendance review teams, or other intervention-related teams to assess the attendance or behavior problem in partnership with the pupil and his or her parents, guardians, or caregivers.

(7) In schools with significantly higher rates of chronic absenteeism, identify barriers to attendance that may require schoolwide strategies rather than case management.

(8) Referral for a comprehensive psychosocial or psychoeducational assessment, including for purposes of creating an individualized education program for an individual with exceptional needs, as that term is defined in Section 56026, or plan adopted for a qualified handicapped person, as that term is defined in regulations promulgated by the United States Department of Education pursuant to Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794).

(9) Referral to a school attendance review board established by the county or by a school district pursuant to Section 48321 or to the probation department pursuant to Section 48263.

(10) Referral to a truancy mediation program operated by the county’s
 district attorney or probation officer pursuant to Section 48260.6.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 167, Sec. 7.   (AB 2109)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

48241.

In any city or city and county no supervisor of attendance or assistant supervisors of attendance shall be appointed, unless he has been lawfully certificated for the work by the county board of education.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

48242.

The governing board of a school district may appoint a school district supervisor of attendance to act under the direction of the county supervisor of attendance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 829, Sec. 2.   (AB 2815)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

48243.

Two or more districts may unite in appointing a district supervisor of attendance and in paying his compensation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

48244.

A school district may contract with the county superintendent of schools for the supervision of attendance of pupils in the school district. The county superintendent of schools shall transfer from the funds of the school district to the county school service fund an amount equal to the actual cost of providing for the supervision of attendance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 829, Sec. 3.   (AB 2815)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

48245.

In any district or districts with an average daily attendance of 1,000 or more school children, according to the annual school report of the last preceding school year, no district supervisor of attendance shall be appointed, unless he has been lawfully certificated for the work by the county board of education.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

48246.

The attendance supervisor, who is a full-time attendance supervisor performing no other duties, of any county, city and county, or school district in which any place of employment is situated, or the probation officer of the county, may at any time enter into any such place of employment for the purpose of examining permits to work or to employ of all minors employed in such place of employment, or for the purpose of investigating violations of the provisions of the Labor Code or of the provisions of this chapter, or Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 49100) of this part. If the attendance supervisor or probation officer is denied entrance to such place of employment, or if any violation of laws relating to the education of minors is found to exist, the attendance supervisor or probation officer shall report the denial of entrance or the violation to the Labor Commissioner. Such report shall be made within 48 hours and shall be in writing, setting forth the fact that he has good cause to believe that such laws are being violated in such place of employment and describing the nature of the violation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Truants [48260. - 48273.]

48260.

(a) A pupil subject to compulsory full-time education or to compulsory continuation education who is absent from school without a valid excuse three full days in one school year or tardy or absent for more than a 30-minute period during the schoolday without a valid excuse on three occasions in one school year, or any combination thereof, shall be classified as a truant and shall be reported to the attendance supervisor or to the superintendent of the school district.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), it is the intent of the Legislature that school districts shall not change the method of attendance accounting provided for in existing law and shall not be required to employ
 period-by-period attendance accounting.

(c) For purposes of this article, a valid excuse includes, but is not limited to, the reasons for which a pupil shall be excused from school pursuant to Sections 48205 and 48225.5 and may include other reasons that are within the discretion of school administrators and, based on the facts of the pupil’s circumstances, are deemed to constitute a valid excuse.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 432, Sec. 1.   (AB 2616)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

48260.5.

Upon a pupil’s initial classification as a truant, the school district shall notify the pupil’s parent or guardian using the most cost-effective method possible, which may include email or a telephone call:

(a) That the pupil is truant.

(b) That the parent or guardian is obligated to compel the attendance of the pupil at school.

(c) That alternative educational programs are available in the school district.

(d) That the parent or guardian has the right to meet with appropriate school personnel to discuss solutions to the pupil’s truancy.

(e) That mental health and supportive services may be available to the pupil and the family.

(f) That school personnel are available to meet with the pupil and family to develop strategies to support the pupil’s attendance at school.

(g) That research shows that missing 10 percent of school for any reason can translate into pupils having difficulty learning to read by third grade, achieving in middle school, and graduating from high school.

(h) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2025.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 1) and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 863, Sec. 2.   (SB 691)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Operative July 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

48260.6.

(a) In any county which has not established a county school attendance review board pursuant to Section 48321, the school district may notify the district attorney or the probation officer, or both, of the county in which the school district is located, by first-class mail or other reasonable means, of the following if the district attorney or the probation officer has elected to participate in the truancy mediation program described in subdivision (d):

(1) The name of each pupil who has been classified as a truant.

(2) The name and address of the parent or guardian of each pupil who has been classified as a truant.

(b) The school district may also notify the district attorney or the probation officer, or both, as to whether the pupil continues to be classified as a truant after the parents have been notified pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 48260.5.

(c) In any county which has not established a county school attendance review board, the district attorney or the probation officer of the county in which the school district is located may notify the parents or guardians of every truant, by first-class mail or other reasonable means, that they may be subject to prosecution pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 48290) of Chapter 2 of Part 27 for failure to compel the attendance of the pupil at school.

(d) If the district attorney or the probation officer, or both, are notified by a school district that a child continues to be classified as a truant after the parents or guardians have been notified pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 48260.5, the district attorney or the probation officer in any county which has not established a county school attendance review board may request the parents or guardians and the child to attend a meeting in the district attorney’s office or at the probation department pursuant to Section 601.3 of the Welfare and Institutions Code to discuss the possible legal consequences of the child’s truancy. Notice of the meeting shall be given pursuant to Section 601.3 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1024, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

48261.

Any pupil who has once been reported as a truant and who is again absent from school without valid excuse one or more days, or tardy on one or more days, shall again be reported as a truant to the attendance supervisor or the superintendent of the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

48262.

Any pupil is deemed an habitual truant who has been reported as a truant three or more times per school year, provided that no pupil shall be deemed an habitual truant unless an appropriate district officer or employee has made a conscientious effort to hold at least one conference with a parent or guardian of the pupil and the pupil himself, after the filing of either of the reports required by Section 48260 or Section 48261. For purposes of this section, a conscientious effort means attempting to communicate with the parents of the pupil at least once using the most cost-effective method possible, which may include electronic mail or a telephone call.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 724, Sec. 22.   (AB 1610)   Effective October 19, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

48263.

(a) If a minor pupil in a school district of a county is a habitual truant, or is a chronic absentee, as defined in Section 60901, or is habitually insubordinate or disorderly during attendance at school, the pupil may be referred to a school attendance review board, or to the probation department for services if the probation department has elected to receive these referrals. The school district supervisor of attendance, or any other persons the governing board of the school district or county may designate, making the referral shall provide documentation of the interventions undertaken at the school to the pupil, the pupil’s parents or guardians, and the school attendance review board or probation department and shall notify the pupil and parents or guardians of the pupil, in writing, of the name and address of the school
 attendance review board or probation department to which the matter has been referred and of the reason for the referral. The notice shall indicate that the pupil and parents or guardians of the pupil will be required, along with the referring person, to meet with the school attendance review board or probation officer to consider a proper disposition of the referral.

(b) (1) If the school attendance review board or probation officer determines that available community services can resolve the problem of the truant or insubordinate pupil, then the school attendance review board or probation officer shall direct the pupil or the pupil’s parents or guardians, or both, to make use of those community services. The school attendance review board or probation officer may require, at any time that it determines proper, the pupil or parents or guardians of the pupil, or both, to furnish satisfactory evidence of participation in
 the available community services.

(2) If the school attendance review board or probation officer determines that available community services cannot resolve the problem of the truant or insubordinate pupil or if the pupil or the parents or guardians of the pupil, or both, have failed to respond to directives of the school attendance review board or probation officer or to services provided, the school attendance review board may, pursuant to Section 48263.5, notify the district attorney or the probation officer, or both, of the county in which the school district is located, or the probation officer may, pursuant to Section 48263.5, notify the district attorney, if the district attorney or the probation officer has elected to participate in the truancy mediation program described in that section.

(c) In any county that has not established a school attendance review board, if the
 school district determines that available community resources cannot resolve the problem of the truant or insubordinate pupil, or if the pupil or the pupil’s parents or guardians, or both, have failed to respond to the directives of the school district or the services provided, the school district, pursuant to Section 48260.6, may notify the district attorney or the probation officer, or both, of the county in which the school district is located, if the district attorney or the probation officer has elected to participate in the truancy mediation program described in Section 48260.6.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 323, Sec. 2.   (AB 901)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

48263.5.

(a) In any county which has established a county school attendance review board pursuant to Section 48321, the school attendance review board may notify the district attorney or the probation officer, or both, of the county in which the school district is located, or the probation officer may notify the district attorney, by first-class mail or other reasonable means, of the following if the district attorney or the probation officer has elected to participate in the truancy mediation program described in subdivision (b):

(1) The name of each pupil who has been classified as a truant and concerning whom the school attendance review board or the probation officer has determined:

(A) That available community services cannot resolve the truancy or insubordination problem.

(B) That the pupil or the parents or guardians of the pupil, or both, have failed to respond to directives of the school attendance review board or probation officer or to services provided.

(2) The name and address of the parent or guardian of each pupil described in paragraph (1).

(b) Upon receipt of notification provided pursuant to subdivision (a), the district attorney or the probation officer may notify the parents or guardians of each pupil concerning whom notification has been received, by first-class mail or other reasonable means, that they may be subject to prosecution pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 48290) of Chapter 2 of Part 27 for failure to compel the attendance of the pupil at school. The district attorney or the probation officer may also request the parents or guardians and the child to attend a meeting in the district attorney’s office or at the probation department pursuant to Section 601.3 of the Welfare and Institutions Code to discuss the possible legal consequences of the child’s truancy. Notice of the meeting shall be given pursuant to Section 601.3 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1024, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

48263.6.

Any pupil subject to compulsory full-time education or to compulsory continuation education who is absent from school without a valid excuse for 10 percent or more of the schooldays in one school year, from the date of enrollment to the current date, is deemed a chronic truant, provided that the appropriate school district officer or employee has complied with Sections 48260, 48260.5, 48261, 48262, 48263, and 48291.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 647, Sec. 1.   (SB 1317)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

48264.

The attendance supervisor or his or her designee, a peace officer, a school administrator or his or her designee, or a probation officer may arrest or assume temporary custody, during school hours, of any minor subject to compulsory full-time education or to compulsory continuation education found away from his or her home and who is absent from school without valid excuse within the county, city, or city and county, or school district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1023, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

48264.5.

A minor who is classified as a truant pursuant to Section 48260 or 48261 may be required to attend makeup classes conducted on one day of a weekend pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 37223 and is subject to the following:

(a) The first time a truancy report is issued, the pupil and, as appropriate, the parent or legal guardian, may be requested to attend a meeting with a school counselor or other school designee to discuss the root causes of the attendance issue and develop a joint plan to improve the pupil’s attendance.

(b) The second time a truancy report is issued within the same school year, the pupil may be given a written warning by a peace officer as specified in Section 830.1 of the Penal Code. A record of the
 written warning may be kept at the school for not less than two years or until the pupil graduates or transfers from that school. If the pupil transfers from that school, the record may be forwarded to the school receiving the pupil’s school records. A record of the written warning may be maintained by the law enforcement agency in accordance with that law enforcement agency’s policies and procedures. The pupil may also be assigned by the school to an afterschool or weekend study program located within the same county as the pupil’s school. If the pupil fails to successfully complete the assigned study program, the pupil shall be subject to subdivision (c).

(c) The third time a truancy report is issued within the same school year, the pupil shall be classified as a habitual truant, as defined in Section 48262, and may be referred to, and required to attend, an attendance review board or a truancy mediation program pursuant to Section 48263 or
 pursuant to Section 601.3 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. If the school district does not have a truancy mediation program, the pupil may be required to attend a comparable program deemed acceptable by the school district’s attendance supervisor. If the pupil does not successfully complete the truancy mediation program or other similar program, the pupil shall be subject to subdivision (d).

(d) The fourth time a truancy report is issued within the same school year, the pupil may be within the jurisdiction of the juvenile court that may adjudge the pupil to be a ward of the court pursuant to Section 601 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. If the pupil is adjudged a ward of the court, the pupil shall be required to do one or more of the following:

(1) Performance at court-approved community services sponsored by either a public or private nonprofit agency for not less than
 20 hours but not more than 40 hours over a period not to exceed 90 days, during a time other than the pupil’s hours of school attendance or employment. The probation officer shall report to the court the failure of the pupil to comply with this paragraph.

(2) Payment of a fine by the pupil of not more than fifty dollars ($50) for which a parent or legal guardian of the pupil may be jointly liable. The fine described in this paragraph shall not be subject to the assessments of Section 1464 of the Penal Code or any other applicable section.

(3) Attendance of a court-approved truancy prevention program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 301, Sec. 11.   (SB 1057)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

48265.

Any person arresting or assuming temporary custody of a minor pursuant to Section 48264 shall forthwith deliver the minor either to the parent, guardian, or other person having control, or charge of the minor, or to the school from which the minor is absent, or to a nonsecure youth service or community center designated by the school or district for counseling prior to returning such minor to his home or school, or to a school counselor or pupil services and attendance officer located at a police station for the purpose of obtaining immediate counseling from the counselor or officer prior to returning or being returned to his home or school, or, if the minor is found to have been declared an habitual truant, he shall cause the minor to be brought before the probation officer of the county having jurisdiction over minors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

48266.

Any person taking action pursuant to Sections 48264 and 48265 shall report the matter, and the disposition made by him of the minor to the school authorities of the city, or city and county, or school district and to the minor’s parent or guardian.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

48267.

Any pupil who has been found to be a person described in Section 602 and as a condition of probation is required to attend a school program approved by a probation officer, who is reported as a truant from school one or more days or tardy on one or more days without valid excuse, in the same school year or in a succeeding year, shall be brought to the attention of the juvenile court and the pupil’s probation or parole officer within 10 days of the reported violation.

Notwithstanding Section 827 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, written notice that a minor enrolled in a public school in any of grades 7 to 12, inclusive, has been found by a court to be a person described in Section 602 and as a condition of probation is required to attend a school program approved by
 a probation officer shall be provided by the juvenile court, within seven days of the entry of the dispositional order, to the superintendent of the school district of attendance, which information shall be expeditiously transmitted to the principal or to one person designated by the principal of the school that the minor is attending. The principal or the principal’s designee shall not disclose this information to any other person except as otherwise required by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 323, Sec. 3.   (AB 901)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

48268.

The court may render judgment that the parent, guardian, or person having the control or charge of the pupil shall deliver the pupil at the beginning of each schoolday, for the remainder of the school term, at the school from which the pupil is a truant or to a school designated by school authorities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 323, Sec. 4.   (AB 901)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

48269.

If the parent, guardian, or other person having control or charge of the pupil, within three days after the rendition of the judgment executes a bond to the governing board of the school district in the sum of two hundred dollars ($200), conditioned that the pupil will, during the remainder of the current school year, regularly attend a public or private school in the city, or city and county, or school district, the court may make an order suspending the execution of the judgment so long as the condition of the bond is complied with. The bond shall be filed with the secretary of the board of education, or clerk of the board of trustees. All money paid or collected on the bond shall be paid into the county treasury as provided in Section 41001.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 323, Sec. 5.   (AB 901)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

48273.

The governing board of each school district shall adopt rules and regulations to require the appropriate officers and employees of the district to gather and transmit to the county superintendent of schools the number and types of referrals to school attendance review boards and of requests for petitions to the juvenile court pursuant to Section 48263.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 843.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Violations [48290. - 48297.]

48290.

The governing board of any school district, shall, on the complaint of any person, make full and impartial investigation of all charges against any parent, guardian, or other person having control or charge of any child, for violation of any of the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

48291.

If it appears upon investigation that any parent, guardian, or other person having control or charge of any child has violated any of the provisions of this chapter, the secretary of the board of education, except as provided in Section 48292, or the clerk of the board of trustees, shall refer such person to a school attendance review board. In the event that any such parent, guardian, or other person continually and willfully fails to respond to directives of the school attendance review board or services provided, the school attendance review board shall direct the school district to make and file in the proper court a criminal complaint against the parent, guardian, or other person, charging the violation, and shall see that the charge is prosecuted by the proper authority. In the event that a criminal complaint is not prosecuted by the proper authority as recommended, the official making the determination not to prosecute shall provide the school attendance review board with a written explanation for the decision not to prosecute.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1329, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

48292.

In counties, cities, and cities and counties, and in school districts having an attendance supervisor, the attendance supervisor shall make and file the complaint provided for by this article and shall see that the charge is prosecuted by the proper authorities.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

48293.

(a) Any parent, guardian, or other person having control or charge of any pupil who fails to comply with this chapter, unless excused or exempted therefrom, is guilty of an infraction and shall be punished as follows:

(1) Upon a first conviction, by a fine of not more than one hundred dollars ($100).

(2) Upon a second conviction, by a fine of not more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

(3) Upon a third or subsequent conviction, if the person has willfully refused to comply with this section, by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500). In lieu of imposing the fines prescribed in paragraphs (1), (2), and (3), the court may order the person to be placed in a parent education and counseling program.

(b) A judgment that a person convicted of an infraction be punished as prescribed in subdivision (a) may also provide for the payment of the fine within a specified time or in specified installments, or for participation in the program. A judgment granting a defendant time to pay the fine or prescribing the days of attendance in a program shall order that if the defendant fails to pay the fine, or any installment thereof, on the date that it is due, or fails to attend a program on a prescribed date, he or she shall appear in court on that date for further proceedings. Willful violation of the order is punishable as contempt.

(c) The court may also order that the person convicted of the violation of subdivision (a) immediately enroll or reenroll the pupil in the appropriate school or educational program and provide proof of enrollment to the court. Willful violation of an order under this subdivision is punishable as civil contempt with a fine of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000). An order of contempt under this subdivision shall not include imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 273, Sec. 1.   Effective September 14, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

48294.

All fines paid as penalties for the violation of any of the provisions of this chapter shall, when collected or received, be paid over by the court or officer receiving them to the treasurer of the city, county, or city and county, in which the offense was committed, to be placed to the credit of the school fund of the school district in which the offense was committed. Such moneys shall be used to support the activities of the school attendance review board prescribed by Section 48291 and the parent education and counseling program prescribed by Section 48293.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 931, Sec. 130.   Effective September 28, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

48295.

Any judge of the superior court, in the county in which the school district is located, or in which the offense is committed, has jurisdiction of offenses committed under this article. A juvenile court has jurisdiction of a violation of Section 48293 as provided by Section 601.4 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 449, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

48296.

No fees shall be charged or received by any court or officer in any proceeding under this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

48297.

(a) (1) A state or local agency conducting a truancy-related mediation or prosecuting a pupil or a pupil’s parent or legal guardian pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 48260), this article, Section 48454, Section 270.1 or 272 of the Penal Code, or Section 601 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, as applicable, shall provide, using the most cost-effective method possible, including, but not limited to, by email or telephone, the school district, school attendance review board, county superintendent of schools, probation department, or any other agency that referred a truancy-related mediation, criminal complaint, or petition with the outcome of each referral. For purposes of this section, “outcome” means the imposed conditions or terms placed on a pupil
 or a pupil’s parent or legal guardian and the acts or actions taken by a state or local agency with respect to a truancy-related mediation, prosecution, criminal complaint, or petition.

(2) This subdivision applies to, but is not limited to, the referrals referenced in Article 5 (commencing with Section 48260), this article, Section 48454, Sections 270.1 and 272 of the Penal Code, and Sections 601, 601.2, and 601.3 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to determine the best evidence-based practices to reduce truancy. This section is not intended to encourage additional referrals, complaints, petitions, or prosecutions, or to encourage more serious sanctions for pupils.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 101.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Pupil Attendance Alternatives [48300. - 48317.]

48300.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Active military duty” means full-time military duty status in the active uniformed service of the United States, including members of the National Guard and the State Reserve on active duty orders pursuant to Chapter 1209 (commencing with Section 12301) of, and Chapter 1211 (commencing with Section 12401) of, Part II of Subtitle E of Title 10 of the United States Code.

(b) “Foster youth” has the same meaning as specified in Section 42238.01.

(c) “Homeless child or youth” has the same meaning as “homeless children and youths” specified in Section 11434a(2) of Title 42 of the United States
 Code.

(d) “Parent” means the natural or adoptive parent or guardian of a dependent child.

(e) “School district of choice” means a school district for which a resolution is in effect as described in subdivision (a) of Section 48301.

(f) “School district of residence” means the school district that a pupil would be directed by this chapter to attend, except as otherwise provided by this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 865, Sec. 1.   (SB 897)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

48301.

(a) (1) The governing board of a school district may elect to operate the school district as a school district of choice and may accept transfers from school districts of residence pursuant to this article. If the governing board of a school district elects to accept transfers as authorized pursuant to this article, it shall, by resolution, determine and adopt the number of transfers it is willing to accept pursuant to this article and shall accept all pupils who apply to transfer until the school district of choice is at maximum capacity. The school district of choice shall ensure that pupils admitted pursuant to this article are selected through an unbiased process that prohibits an inquiry into or evaluation or consideration of whether or not a pupil should be enrolled based upon academic or athletic
 performance, physical condition, proficiency in English, any of the individual characteristics set forth in Section 200, and, except for purposes of determining priority for pupils eligible for free or reduced-price meals pursuant to Section 48306, family income.

(2) If the number of transfer applications exceeds the number of transfers the governing board of a school district of choice elects to accept pursuant to this article, approval for transfer pursuant to this article shall be determined by a random drawing held in public at a regularly scheduled meeting of the governing board of the school district of choice.

(b) Communications to parents by school districts of choice shall be factually accurate and not target individual parents or residential neighborhoods on the basis of a pupil’s or pupils’ actual or perceived academic or athletic skill, proficiency in English, any of
 the individual characteristics set forth in Section 200, or family income.

(c) A school district of choice, with respect to compliance with this article, shall be subject to the audit conducted pursuant to Section 41020.

(d) A school district of choice shall post application information on its internet website. This information shall include, at a minimum, any applicable form and the timeline for a transfer pursuant to this article. This information also shall include an explanation of the selection process the school district of choice implements pursuant to subdivision (a).

(e) A pupil attending a school in a school district of choice shall be deemed to have fulfilled the requirements of Section 48204.

(f) All communication from a school district of
 choice regarding the transfer opportunities pursuant to the program shall be available in all languages for which translations are required in the school district of residence pursuant to Section 48985.

(g) A school district of choice shall register as a school district of choice with both the Superintendent, in a manner specified by the Superintendent, and the county board of education where the school district of choice is located.

(h) A school district of choice shall not enroll pupils pursuant to this article until the school district has registered pursuant to subdivision (g).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 865, Sec. 2.   (SB 897)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

48302.

School districts are encouraged to hold informational meetings and make public announcements on the current educational programs the school district is offering so that parents may provide input to the school district on methods to improve the current programs and so that parents may make informed decisions regarding their children’s education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 15, Sec. 33.   (AB 99)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

48303.
